Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 10 Freeways

24-10-1.
“Freeway” defined.

A “freeway” is a way especially designed for through traffic over which abutters have no easement or right of light, air, or access by reason of the fact that their property abuts upon the way.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2537, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 75, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-10-1

.

24-10-2.
Jurisdiction over freeways.

The director of transportation shall have full power and authority to lay out, establish, acquire, open, construct, improve, maintain, discontinue, and regulate the use of freeways within this state in the same manner or manners in which the director may now lay out, establish, acquire, open, construct, improve, maintain, discontinue, and regulate the use of highways within this state. The director shall also have any and all other additional authority and power relative to such freeways as he or she now possesses relative to highways, including the authority and power to acquire or accept title to the lands or rights-of-way needed for freeways.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2537, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 75, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

24-10-2

.

24-10-3.
Extinguishment of easements — Regulation of access.

Where an existing highway has been designated as or included within a freeway by the director, existing easements of access, light or air may be extinguished by purchase or by taking under eminent domain, in accordance with any existing method now exercised by the director in purchasing or taking land for highway purposes. Access to the freeway from any existing highway, road or street may be regulated and restricted by the director. Access to the freeway from any new highway, road or street shall be subject to the consent and approval of the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2537, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 75, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; G.L. 1956, §

24-10-3

.

24-10-4.
Commercial enterprises prohibited.

No commercial enterprise involving the sale or distribution of any commodity or product used in, or for the servicing of, any motor vehicle shall be authorized or conducted by the director of transportation or by any agency or officer of the state, within or on the property acquired for or designated as a freeway, as defined in this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 75, § 4; P.L. 1949, ch. 2392, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-10-4

.

24-10-5.
Fuel and service facilities adjacent to freeways.

In order to permit the establishment of adequate fuel and other service facilities by private owners or their lessees for the users of a freeway, the director of transportation shall provide for access roads within the state’s right-of-way of any freeway established or designated as provided in this chapter, at points which in his or her opinion, will best serve the public interest.

The location of fuel and other service facilities may be indicated to the users of the freeway by appropriate sign, the size, style, and specifications of which shall be determined by the director of transportation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 75, § 4; P.L. 1949, ch. 2392, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-10-5

.

24-10-6.
Chapter supplemental.

This chapter shall be considered supplementary and in addition to any and all other powers now exercised by the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1937, ch. 2537, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 75, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 100; redesignated § 5 by P.L. 1949, ch. 2392, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

24-10-6

.

24-10-7 — 24-10-16.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 155, §§ 1, 2; Repealed by P.L. 1966, ch. 117, § 2, effective May 6, 1966. For present law, see §§

24-10.1-1

—

24-10.1-1

2.

24-10-17.
Soliciting rides in motor vehicles.

Any person who endeavors by words, gestures, or otherwise to beg, invite, or secure transportation in any motor vehicle on any freeway within the state, except in the case of a bona fide emergency or in the case of sickness, is subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

Any person who endeavors to solicit a ride in a motor vehicle in the manner described in this section on the traveled portion of any other public highway in this state shall be subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 102; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 49, § 1, effective June 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 50, § 1, effective June 11, 2021.

24-10-18.
Backing up prohibited.

Any person who backs up a motor vehicle on a roadway or shoulder of any freeway within the state, shall be subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 115, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 63; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 4; P.L. 2021, ch. 49, § 1, effective June 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 50, § 1, effective June 11, 2021.

24-10-19.
Advertising motor vehicles for sale on state highways.

Any person who parks a motor vehicle in a designated parking area provided by the state for a period in excess of twelve (12) hours, for the purpose of advertising the vehicle for sale shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 279, § 1.

24-10-20.
Park and ride lots.

Park and ride lots, also known as fringe and transportation corridor parking facilities, are facilities which are intended to be used for the temporary parking of passenger vehicles and which are located and designed so as to facilitate the safe and convenient transfer of persons traveling in passenger vehicles to and from high occupancy vehicles and/or public mass transportation systems including rail. Any other vehicle parked and/or property, including but not limited to, boats or commercial type trailer boxes, stored at those lots will be fined and towed at owner’s expense. State and local law enforcement officials have authority to ticket and tow any vehicles under this statute. Violations of this section are subject to fines enumerated in §

31-41.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 63; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 4.

Applicability.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 12, § 19 provides that the amendment to this section by that act takes effect July 1, 2008, and shall apply to all offenses committed on July 1, 2008 and thereafter.